Hawaii statutes.
§576B-211 Continuing, exclusive
jurisdiction to modify spousal support order. (a) A tribunal of this
State issuing a spousal support order consistent with the law of this State has
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal support order throughout
the existence of the support obligation.

(b) A tribunal of this State may not modify a
spousal support order issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign
country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law
of that state or foreign country.

(c) A tribunal of this State that has
continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal support order may serve as:

(1) An initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of
another state to enforce the spousal support order issued in this State; or

(2) A responding tribunal to enforce or modify its
own spousal support order. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next